Arkansas, session 2025, SB56.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-15-401(c), concerning the reporting,
sunsetting, and extension of rules, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) The agencies shall be divided into six (6) rule review groups to
be determined by the Governor to ensure that the number of agencies in each
rule review group and the number of subject matter areas represented by each
rule review group are approximately equal.
(2) If a new agency is created, the Governor shall assign the new
agency to a rule review group.
(3)(A) The Governor may amend the division of agencies into rule
review groups.
(B) An amendment to the division of agencies into rule
review groups on or after the effective date of this subdivision (c)(3) shall
not result in the rules of an agency being evaluated more than twelve (12)
years from their last evaluation under this section.



*MBM066*
01/14/2025 8:28:21 AM MBM066